zh-TW: 相容暖氣片樣式: 護壁板散熱器; 欄桿散熱器; 對流散熱器; 雙燃料散熱器; 電散熱器; 板式散熱器; 毛巾架散熱器; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas radiatoriaus tipas: Grindjuostės radiatorius; Stulpelio radiatorius; Konvektorinis radiatorius; Dvigubo kuro radiatorius; Elektrinis radiatorius; Panelinis radiatorius; Rankšluosčių džiovintuvo radiatorius; Kita
ko: 호환 라디에이터 스타일: 베이스보드 라디에이터; 컬럼 라디에이터; 대류식 라디에이터; 듀얼 연료 라디에이터; 전기 라디에이터; 패널 라디에이터; 타월 레일 라디에이터; 기타
nl: Compatibel radiatortype: Plintradiator; Kolomradiator; Convectorradiator; Hybride radiator; Elektrische radiator; Paneelradiator; Handdoekradiator; Overig
nb: Kompatibel radiatorstil: Baseline-radiator; Kolonne-radiator; Konvektorradiator; Dobbeltbrenselradiator; Elektrisk radiator; Panelradiator; Håndkletørkerradiator; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiv slog radiatorja: Podnožje radiatorja; Stebrni radiator; Konvektorski radiator; Dvogorivni radiator; Električni radiator; Panelni radiator; Radiator za brisače; Druga
tr: Uyumlu radyatör stili: Süpürgelik tipi radyatör; Kolon radyatör; Konvektör tipi radyatör; Çift yakıtlı radyatör; Elektrikli radyatör; Panel radyatör; Havlupan; Diğer
ja: 互換性のあるラジエーターのスタイル: ベースボードラジエーター; カラムラジエーター; コンベクターラジエーター; デュアル燃料ラジエーター; 電気ラジエーター; パネルラジエーター; タオルレールラジエーター; その他
el: Συμβατό στυλ καλοριφέρ: Καλοριφέρ σοβατεπί; Καλοριφέρ στήλης; Καλοριφέρ τύπου convector; Καλοριφέρ διπλής τροφοδοσίας; Ηλεκτρικό καλοριφέρ; Καλοριφέρ πάνελ; Θερμαινόμενη πετσετοκρεμάστρα; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis radiátorstílus: Szegélyradiátor; Oszlop radiátor; Konvektor radiátor; Kettős üzemanyagú radiátor; Elektromos radiátor; Panel radiátor; Törölközőszárító radiátor; Egyéb
en: Compatible radiator style: Baseboard radiator; Column radiator; Convector radiator; Dual-fuel radiator; Electric radiator; Panel radiator; Towel rail radiator; Other
pl: Kompatybilny typ grzejnika: Grzejnik listwowy; Grzejnik kolumnowy; Grzejnik konwektorowy; Grzejnik dwupaliwowy; Grzejnik elektryczny; Grzejnik panelowy; Grzejnik drabinkowy; Pozostałe
cs: Kompatibilní typ radiátoru: Soklový radiátor; Článkový radiátor; Konvektor; Kombinovaný radiátor; Elektrický radiátor; Deskový radiátor; Žebříkový radiátor; Jiné
es: Estilo de radiador compatible: Radiador de zócalo; Radiador de columna; Radiador convector; Radiador de combustible dual; Radiador eléctrico; Radiador de panel; Radiador toallero; Otros
it: Stile del radiatore compatibile: Radiatore a battiscopa; Radiatore a colonna; Radiatore convettore; Radiatore a doppio combustibile; Radiatore elettrico; Radiatore a pannello; Radiatore scaldasalviette; Altro
fr: Type de radiateur compatible: Radiateur plinthe; Radiateur à colonnes; Radiateur convecteur; Radiateur double énergie; Radiateur électrique; Radiateur panneau; Radiateur sèche-serviettes; Autre
sv: Kompatibel radiatorstil: Sockelradiator; kolumnradiator; Konvektorradiator; Dubbelbränsleradiator; Elektrisk radiator; Panelradiator; Handdukstork / radiator; Övrigt
ru: Совместимый тип радиатора: Напольный радиатор; Колонный радиатор; Конвекторный радиатор; Двухтопливный радиатор; Электрический радиатор; Панельный радиатор; Полотенцесушитель; Другой
zh-CN: 兼容的散热器款式: 踢脚线式散热器; 柱式散热器; 对流散热器; 双能源散热器; 电散热器; 板式散热器; 毛巾架式散热器; 其他
hr-HR: Kompatibilni stil radijatora: Podni radijator; Cijevni radijator; Konvektorski radijator; Radijator s dvostrukim pogonom; Električni radijator; Panelni radijator; Radijator s držačem za ručnike; Ostalo
th: รูปแบบเครื่องทำความร้อนที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เครื่องทำความร้อนติดตั้งที่ฐานผนังห้อง; เครื่องทำความร้อนแบบคอลัมน์; เครื่องทำความร้อนแบบพาความร้อน; เครื่องทำความร้อนแบบสองระบบ; เครื่องทำความร้อนไฟฟ้า; เครื่องทำความร้อนแบบแผง; เครื่องทำความร้อนสำหรับห้องน้ำ; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel radiatorstil: Gulvradiator; Søjleradiator; Konvektorradiator; Radiator med dual-fuel; Elektrisk radiator; Panelradiator; Radiator til tørring af håndklæder; Andet
pt-PT: Estilo de radiador compatível: Radiador de rodapé; Radiador de coluna; Radiador de convecção; Radiador de combustível duplo; Radiador elétrico; Radiador de painel; Radiador de toalhas; Outro
vi: Kiểu lò sưởi tương thích: Lò sưởi ốp chân tường; Lò sưởi dạng cột; Lò sưởi đối lưu; Lò sưởi nhiên liệu kép; Lò sưởi điện; Lò sưởi dạng tấm; Lò sưởi kiêm giá treo khăn; Khác
ro-RO: Model de calorifer compatibil: Calorifer de plintă; Calorifer cu coloane; Calorifer convector; Calorifer cu combustibil dual; Calorifer electric; Calorifer panou; Calorifer tip suport pentru prosoape; Altele
sk-SK: Kompatibilný štýl radiátora: Soklový radiátor; Stĺpový radiátor; Konvektorový radiátor; Radiátor s dvojitým zdrojom tepla; Elektrický radiátor; Panelový radiátor; Radiátor na uteráky; Iné
pt-BR: Estilo de radiador compatível: Radiador de rodapé; Radiador de coluna; Radiador convector; Radiador híbrido; Radiador elétrico; Radiador de painel; Toalheiro aquecido; Outro
de: Kompatibler Heizkörpertyp: Sockelheizkörper; Gliederheizkörper; Konvektorheizung; Heizkörper Mischbetrieb; Elektrische Heizung; Paneelheizkörper; Handtuchheizkörper; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Съвместим стил на радиатор: Первазен радиатор; Колонен радиатор; Конвекторен радиатор; Двугоривен радиатори; Електрически радиатор; Панелен радиатор; Радиатор за кърпи; Друго
fi: Yhteensopiva patterityyppi: Jalkalistapatteri; Pylväspatteri; Konvektorilämmitin; Kaksoispolttoainelämmitin; Sähköpatteri; Levypatteri; Pyyhepatteri; Muu